Washington statutes.
RCW 11.54.020

Amount of basic award. (Effective until August 1, 2024.)

The amount of the basic award shall be the amount specified in *RCW 6.13.030(2) with regard to lands. If an award is divided between a surviving spouse or surviving domestic partner and the decedent's children who are not the children of the surviving spouse or surviving domestic partner, the aggregate amount awarded to all the claimants under this section shall be the amount specified in *RCW 6.13.030(2) with respect to lands. The amount of the basic award may be increased or decreased in accordance with RCW 11.54.040 and 11.54.050.

[ 2008 c 6 s 917; 1997 c 252 s 49.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 6.13.030 was amended by 2021 c 290 s 3, significantly changing subsection (2).

Part headings not law—Severability—2008 c 6: See RCW 26.60.900 and 26.60.901.

Application—1997 c 252 ss 1-73: See note following RCW 11.02.005.

PDFRCW 11.54.020

Amount of basic award. (Effective August 1, 2024.)

(1) The amount of the basic award shall be the greater of the following:

(a) The value, as of the date of the decedent's death, of the decedent's property, or if the decedent is married or has a registered domestic partner, the value of the community property of the decedent and the decedent's spouse or registered domestic partner, that was exempt from attachment, execution, or forced sale under Title 6 RCW immediately before the decedent's death; or

(b) The amount specified in RCW 6.13.030(1)(a) or, if greater, the amount specified in subsection (3) of this section, on the date of the decedent's death.

(2) If an award is divided among a surviving spouse or surviving registered domestic partner and the decedent's dependent children, the aggregate amount awarded to all the claimants under this section shall be the amount specified in subsection (1) of this section.

(3) For 2024 and each calendar year thereafter, the amount of the basic award shall not be less than an amount that is calculated as follows: $125,000 multiplied by the inflation factor and then rounded to the nearest $1,000. The adjustment of the basic amount under this subsection shall be effective annually as of the first calendar day of the calendar year. The inflation factor is a fraction, the numerator of which is the consumer price index figure published for the most recent October preceding the effective date of the adjustment and the denominator of which is the consumer price index figure published for October 2021. No adjustment to the basic award shall be made under this subsection for a calendar year if the adjustment would result in the same or a lesser basic award than the basic award for the immediately preceding calendar year. For purposes of this subsection, "consumer price index" means the consumer price index for all urban consumers, all items in the Seattle area, not seasonally adjusted, as calculated by the bureau of labor statistics of the United States department of labor. For purposes of this subsection (3), "Seattle area" means the geographic area sample that includes Seattle and surrounding areas. In the event the bureau of labor statistics discontinues the use and publication of applicable averages, then the consumer price index to be used for the computation of the inflation factor shall be the consumer price average that was last published before the event that caused the inflation factor to be applied.

[ 2024 c 20 s 6; 2008 c 6 s 917; 1997 c 252 s 49.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Savings—2024 c 20: See notes following RCW 11.54.001.

Part headings not law—Severability—2008 c 6: See RCW 26.60.900 and 26.60.901.

Application—1997 c 252 ss 1-73: See note following RCW 11.02.005.